Nebraska, session 109, LB48A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $1,000,000 from the Medicaid
Managed Care Excess Profit Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $1,000,000 from the
Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of
Health and Human Services, for Program 33, to aid in carrying out the
provisions of Legislative Bill 48, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First
Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $60,000 for FY2025-26 or
$60,000 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on September 1, 2025.
-1-